Utah statutes.
73-21-2.   Text.
The text of the Ute Indian Water Compact is as follows:
UTE INDIAN WATER COMPACT
The State of Utah, the Ute Indian Tribe of the Uintah and Ouray Reservation,
Utah, and the United States of America, acting through their respective
representatives agree to a Ute Indian Water Compact as follows:
ARTICLE I
Purpose of Compact
The purpose of this Compact is to remove the causes of present and future
controversy over the quantification, distribution, and use of all waters
claimed by or through the Ute Indian Tribe.
ARTICLE II
Legal Basis for Compact
This Compact is made in accordance with the Constitution and Laws of the
United States, the State of Utah, and the Ute Indian Tribe.
ARTICLE III
Water
There is hereby apportioned, confirmed, and recognized from the waters
apportioned to the State of Utah from the Colorado River System to the United
States of America in perpetuity, in trust, for the Ute Indian Tribe and
others, the depletion of water in the amount of 248,943 acre-feet per annum,
and the related gross diversion requirement of 471,035 acre-feet per annum,
from all sources in accordance with and as more fully set out in the
"Tabulation of Ute Indian Water Rights" attached hereto and on file with the
Utah State Engineer. The priority date of October 3, 1861, is recognized for
land groups 1 through 5, except for water supplied from storage in the Central
Utah Project, and the priority date of January 5, 1882, is recognized for land
groups 6 and 7, unless indicated otherwise in the Tabulation. Tables 1, 2, and
3 of the Tabulation list the total irrigable acreage, maximum allowable
depletions and diversion requirements, respectively, for each of the land
groups by stream. No water rights held in trust can be transferred from the
lands listed in said groups without approval of the Secretary of the Interior.
All water delivered to groups 1 and 5 lands from storage under the Central
Utah Project shall be assigned the priority date of the Water and Power
Resources Service filing to accomplish the equitable allocation of water to
all subscribers of the Project.
In addition to the water allocated under the previous paragraph, there is
hereby apportioned, confirmed, and recognized to the United States of America
in perpetuity, in trust, for the Ute Indian Tribe the depletion of 10,000
acre-feet of water annually having a priority date of October 3, 1861, for
municipal and industrial purposes, which shall be diverted from the Green
River. To the extent that the Tribe or its members use reserved water for
domestic, municipal, industrial, or related uses, the quantity so used shall
be included within said 10,000 acre-feet unless a transfer of water from land
listed in the Tabulation is properly made.
No water allocated pursuant to this Compact shall be subject to loss or
forfeiture under the laws of the State of Utah or otherwise. Further, the
water allocated herein shall not be restricted to any particular use, but may
be used for any purpose selected by the Tribe in accordance with the
procedures provided for in this agreement.
The quantities of water apportioned hereby include all water rights of every
nature and description derived from the reserved water rights doctrine, from
all sources of water, both surface and underground, and includes all types and
kinds of uses, whether municipal, industrial, recreational, in-stream uses,
sale, lease, or any other use whatsoever, and encompasses all claims asserted
by or through the Ute Indian Tribe, and all persons and entities other than
the Tribe whose claims or rights are derived, directly or indirectly, from the
reserved water rights of the Tribe. Thus, any water rights adjudicated or
otherwise established in the future on behalf of any person or entity and
based upon a claim, directly or indirectly, through any reserved water rights
of the Tribe shall be included within and as a part of the water quantified by
this Compact. Any state water rights acquired by the Tribe for land to which a
reserved right is recognized herein shall be forfeited.
Included within the practicably irrigable acreages recognized are (1) tribal
lands and individual Indian allotments; (2) Uintah Indian Irrigation Project
lands, which include tribal lands, allotments, and some private lands which
were originally allotted lands; and (3) some few lands distributed to former
tribal members terminated in accordance with the Ute Partition Act, approved
August 27, 1954, P.L. 83-671, 68 Stat. 868, 25 U.S.C. Sections 677-677aa.
Nothing in this Compact shall enlarge or diminish the scope of or otherwise
affect either the United States' trust responsibility or the Ute Indian
Tribe's responsibility to those persons who have been designated as mixed-
bloods under the Act of August 27, 1954 (68 Stat. 868). The total acreage
under irrigation or susceptible to sustained production of agricultural crops
by means of irrigation is recognized as 129,201 acres, reduced by 7% to
120,157 acres to reflect roads, yards, fences, rights-of-way, and other non-
productive lands. All lands in the Uintah Indian Irrigation Project are
designated assessible or non-assessible. The Secretary of the Interior is
authorized to change the designation from one to the other.
Nothing contained herein shall be construed to preclude the United States as
Trustee for the Ute Indian Tribe, the Ute Indian Tribe, or any of its members
from filing application with the Utah State Engineer for the appropriation of
additional water under the laws of the State of Utah.
The diversion and depletion requirements for the water rights apportioned
under this Compact are set forth in Tables 1, 2, and 3 of the Tabulation,
consisting of acreage, diversion, and depletion schedules. The delivery
schedules set forth in Tables 4, 5, 6, and 7 of the Tabulation shall determine
the distribution of the water allocated hereunder. The Utah State Engineer, in
a manner consistent with the agreements and covenants contained herein, shall
have general administrative supervision of all surface and ground waters
apportioned to the United States in trust for the Ute Indian Tribe and others,
including measurement, apportionment, and distribution thereof, to the points
of diversion from the main sources. The United States and the Tribe shall have
general administrative supervision of all water apportioned to the United
States, including measurement, apportionment, and distribution thereof, within
the canal distribution systems from the various points of river diversion.
The United States on behalf of the Tribe, or the Tribe shall comply with the
provisions of Section 73-3-3, Utah Code Annotated 1953, with regard to any
change in the point of diversion, place, or nature of use; except that neither
the United States nor the Tribe need make application to the State Engineer
for change of place of use when the new place of use is within the same canal
system.
The Parties agree to use their best efforts in the expeditious planning and
development of water projects for all group 5 lands, or substitute lands,
including the Uintah and Upalco Units, the Leland Bench Project, or other
similar projects of the Central Utah Project.
This Article is not intended to relieve the responsibility of the parties
involved in the Midview Exchange Agreement and the Agreement dated the 20th
day of September, 1965, among the United States of America, the Ute Indian
Tribe of the Uintah and Ouray Reservation, and the Central Utah Water
Conservancy District. The provisions of said Agreement of September 20, 1965,
shall remain binding upon the parties thereto and continue in full force and
effect.
ARTICLE IV
Enforcement
For purposes of compelling compliance with the terms of this Compact, each
party waives the defense of sovereign immunity as to actions brought by any
other party, including any defense under the Eleventh Amendment to the United
States Constitution. The United States District Court for the District of Utah
is hereby granted jurisdiction to adjudicate any claim made by a party to this
Compact that any other party, or its officials, are acting to impair or
violate any right or privilege in this Compact.
ARTICLE V
Ratification and Amendment
Each party acknowledges that in order for this Compact to constitute a final
and permanent settlement of tribal reserved water rights, this Compact must be
ratified by the United States, the State of Utah, and the Ute Indian Tribe
through referendum of the Tribe's membership. The parties shall use their best
efforts to have the ratifications undertaken as expeditiously as possible. The
parties hereto agree that the terms of this Compact have the force and effect
of law and agree to adopt all statutes, regulations and ordinances that are,
or may be, necessary to harmonize existing statutes, regulations and
ordinances with this Compact, and agree that this Compact may be included
within any general stream adjudication. The Secretary of the Interior is
authorized to implement this Compact by appropriate regulations.
DATED:_________________________ UTE INDIAN TRIBE
By      _________________________________
STATE OF UTAH
By      _________________________________
UNITED STATES OF AMERICA
By      __________________________________
